District of Columbia statutes.
26-551.25

Validity of prior law.

A decision, order, interpretation, agreement, policy statement, opinion, regulation or rule (“decision”) issued and in effect under a law repealed by this chapter or section 124 of the 21st Century Financial Modernization Act of 2000, effective June 9, 2001 (D.C. Law 13-308; 48 DCR 3244 ), shall continue to be valid until the Commissioner amends or withdraws the decision.

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-308, § 125, 48 DCR 3244